Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF627.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2722YH (2) 91 nls/ko H.F. 627 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 533D.9A Annual percentage rate 1 restriction. 2 1. Notwithstanding subsection 3, a licensee shall not 3 impose an annual percentage rate greater than thirty-six 4 percent in connection with a delayed deposit service 5 transaction. 6 2. A delayed deposit service transaction made in violation 7 of this section shall be void, and the licensee making the 8 delayed deposit service transaction shall not collect, receive, 9 or retain any principal, interest, fees, or other charges in 10 connection with the delayed deposit service transaction. 11 3. A licensee shall not impose on an individual on active 12 military duty, or their spouse or dependents, an annual 13 percentage rate greater than the rates allowed under 10 U.S.C. 14 Â§987 in connection with a delayed deposit service transaction. 15